Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [171.025] LIMITATIONS ON USE. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a noncompliant driver's license or identification card marked as provided in section 171.07, subdivision 1, paragraph (g), or 3, paragraph (g), is not valid identification for purposes of any services or form of benefit under Minnesota Statutes. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.06, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Noncompliant license or identification card; residence, lawful status. (a) A person who applies for a noncompliant driver's license or identification card: (1) must declare the applicant's residence address in Minnesota; and (2) deleted text begin is not requireddeleted text end new text begin may choosenew text end to demonstrate United States citizenship or lawful presence in the United States. (b) Minnesota Rules, part 7410.0410, or any successor rule, does not apply for a noncompliant driver's license or identification card. (c) Nothing in this section allows the commissioner to issue a commercial driver's license to an applicant who does not demonstrate proof of citizenship or immigration status if required by federal law. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. License; contents and design. (a) Upon the payment of the required fee, the department shall issue to every qualifying applicant a license designating the type or class of vehicles the applicant is authorized to drive as applied for. This license must bear: (1) a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee; (2) the licensee's full name and date of birth; (3) either (i) the licensee's residence address, or (ii) the designated address under section 5B.05; (4) a description of the licensee in a manner as the commissioner deems necessary; (5) the usual signature of the licensee; and (6) designations and markings as provided in this section. No license is valid unless it bears the usual signature of the licensee. Every license must bear a colored photograph or an electronically produced image of the licensee. (b) If the United States Postal Service will not deliver mail to the applicant's residence address as listed on the license, then the applicant shall provide verification from the United States Postal Service that mail will not be delivered to the applicant's residence address and that mail will be delivered to a specified alternate mailing address. When an applicant provides an alternate mailing address under this subdivision, the commissioner shall use the alternate mailing address in lieu of the applicant's residence address for all notices and mailings to the applicant. (c) Every license issued to an applicant under the age of 21 must be of a distinguishing color and plainly marked "Under-21." (d) A license issued to an applicant age 65 or over must be plainly marked "senior" if requested by the applicant. (e) Except for a noncompliant license, a license must bear a distinguishing indicator for compliance with requirements of the REAL ID Act. (f) A noncompliant license must: (1) be marked "not for federal identification" on the face and in the machine-readable portion; (2) have a unique design or color indicator for purposes of the REAL ID Act; and (3) bear no indicator or design that relates to the lawful presence or the citizenship of the license holder. new text begin (g) A noncompliant license must be marked "not for voting" on the front side and "not for benefits" on the back side commensurate with other text if the license is issued under any of the following circumstances: new text end new text begin (1) the application is for a first-time issuance of a license in Minnesota and the applicant has not demonstrated United States citizenship; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's most recently issued noncompliant license or identification card is marked as required under this paragraph or subdivision 3, paragraph (g), and the applicant has not demonstrated United States citizenship; or new text end new text begin (3) the applicant submits a document that identifies a temporary lawful status or admission period. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h) new text end A REAL ID compliant license issued to a person with temporary lawful status or admission period must be marked "temporary" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end A license must display the licensee's full name or no fewer than 39 characters of the name. Any necessary truncation must begin with the last character of the middle name and proceed through the second letter of the middle name, followed by the last character of the first name and proceeding through the second letter of the first name. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Identification card; content and design; fee. (a) Upon payment of the required fee, the department shall issue to every qualifying applicant a Minnesota identification card. The department may not issue a Minnesota identification card to an individual who has a driver's license, other than a limited license. The department may not issue an enhanced identification card to an individual who is under 16 years of age, not a resident of this state, or not a citizen of the United States of America. The card must bear: (1) a distinguishing number assigned to the applicant; (2) a colored photograph or an electronically produced image of the applicant; (3) the applicant's full name and date of birth; (4) either (i) the licensee's residence address, or (ii) the designated address under section 5B.05; (5) a description of the applicant in the manner as the commissioner deems necessary; (6) the usual signature of the applicant; and (7) designations and markings provided under this section. (b) If the United States Postal Service will not deliver mail to the applicant's residence address as listed on the Minnesota identification card, then the applicant shall provide verification from the United States Postal Service that mail will not be delivered to the applicant's residence address and that mail will be delivered to a specified alternate mailing address. When an applicant provides an alternate mailing address under this subdivision, the commissioner shall use the alternate mailing address in lieu of the applicant's residence address for all notices and mailings to the applicant. (c) Each identification card issued to an applicant under the age of 21 must be of a distinguishing color and plainly marked "Under-21." (d) Each Minnesota identification card must be plainly marked "Minnesota identification card - not a driver's license." (e) Except for a noncompliant identification card, a Minnesota identification card must bear a distinguishing indicator for compliance with requirements of the REAL ID Act. (f) A noncompliant identification card must: (1) be marked "not for federal identification" on the face and in the machine-readable portion; (2) have a unique design or color indicator for purposes of the REAL ID Act; and (3) bear no indicator or design that relates to the lawful presence or the citizenship of the identification card holder. new text begin (g) A noncompliant identification card must be marked "not for voting" on the front side and "not for benefits" on the back side commensurate with other text if the license is issued under any of the following circumstances: new text end new text begin (1) the application is for first-time issuance of a Minnesota identification card and the applicant has not demonstrated United States citizenship; new text end new text begin (2) the applicant's most recently issued noncompliant license or identification card is marked as required under this paragraph or subdivision 1, paragraph (g), and the applicant has not demonstrated United States citizenship; or new text end new text begin (3) the applicant submits a document that identifies a temporary lawful status or admission period. new text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h) new text end A REAL ID compliant Minnesota identification card issued to a person with temporary lawful status or admission period must be marked "temporary" on the face and in the machine-readable portion. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end A Minnesota identification card must display the cardholder's full name or no fewer than 39 characters of the name. Any necessary truncation must begin with the last character of the middle name and proceed through the second letter of the middle name, followed by the last character of the first name and proceeding through the second letter of the first name. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end The fee for a Minnesota identification card is 50 cents when issued to a person who is developmentally disabled, as defined in section 252A.02, subdivision 2; a physically disabled person, as defined in section 169.345, subdivision 2; or, a person with mental illness, as described in section 245.462, subdivision 20, paragraph (c).